Hawaii statutes.
§206M-4 Compliance with state and local
law. The issuance of special purpose revenue bonds with respect to any
project or industrial park under this chapter shall not relieve any qualified
person or other user of the project or industrial park from the laws,
ordinances, and rules of the State or any political subdivision thereof, or any
department or board thereof with respect to the construction, operation, and
maintenance of any project or industrial park, or zoning laws or regulations,
obtaining of building permits, compliance with building and health codes and
other laws, ordinances, or rules and regulations of similar nature pertaining
to the project or industrial park, and the laws shall be applicable to the
qualified person or the other user to the same extent they would be if the
costs of the project or industrial park were directly financed by the qualified
person. [L 1983, c 152, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 72, §8]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next